District of Columbia statutes.
28:9-342

Bank’s right to refuse to enter into or disclose existence of control agreement.

This article does not require a bank to enter into an agreement of the kind described in § 28:9-104(a)(2), even if its customer so requests or directs. A bank that has entered into such an agreement is not required to confirm the existence of the agreement to another person unless requested to do so by its customer.

History

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-201, § 101, 47 DCR 7576

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

1. Source. New; derived from Section 8-106(g).

2. Protection for Bank. This section protects banks from the need to enter into agreements against their will and from the need to respond to inquiries from persons other than their customers.